Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1606
Permit, required; transfer; consent from permitting authority.

Geologic storage is allowed if a permit has been obtained from both the commission and the Underground Injection Control program permitting authority. A permit may be transferred if the commission and the Underground Injection Control program permitting authority consent.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 6.